Arkansas, session 2025, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-38-101 is amended to read as follows:
20-38-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Care” means treatment, services, assistance, education,
training, instruction, or supervision for which the service provider is
compensated either directly or indirectly;
(2) “Determination” means the determination made by either the
licensing or certifying agency or the third-party employee evaluation service
that a service provider, operator, applicant for employment with, or employee
of a service provider is or is not disqualified from licensure, exemption
from licensure, certification, any other operating authority, or employment
*JMB292*
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
based on the criminal history of the service provider, operator, applicant,
or employee;
(3)(A) “Employee” means any person who:
(i) Has unsupervised access to clients of a service
provider, except as provided in subdivision (3)(B) of this section; and
(ii) Meets any of the following criteria:
(a) Provides care to clients of a service
provider on behalf of, under the supervision of, or by arrangement with the
service provider;
(b) Is employed by a service provider to
provide care to clients of the service provider;
(c) Is engaged as an independent contractor to
provide care to clients of a service provider;
(c)(d) Is a temporary employee placed by an
employment agency with a service provider to provide care to clients of the
service provider; or
(d)(e) Resides in an alternative living home
in which services are provided to individuals with developmental
disabilities.
(B) “Employee” does not include a person who:
(i) Is a family member of a client receiving care
from a service provider;
(ii) Is a volunteer; or
(iii) Works in an administrative capacity and does
not have unsupervised access to clients of a service provider;
(4) “Licensing or certifying agency” means the state agency
charged with licensing, exempting from licensure, certifying, or granting
other operating authority to a service provider;
(5) “National criminal history records check” means a review of
criminal history records maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation
based on fingerprint identification or other positive identification methods;
(6) “Operator” means the person signing the application of a
service provider for licensure, exemption from licensure, certification, or
any other operating authority;
(7) “Registry records check” means the review of one (1) or more
database systems maintained by a state agency that contain information
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
relative to a person's suitability for licensure, certification, exemption
from licensure, or any other operating authority to be a service provider or
for employment with a service provider to provide care;
(8) “Report” means a statement of the criminal history of a
service provider, operator, applicant for employment with, or employee of a
service provider issued by the Identification Bureau of the Division of
Arkansas State Police;
(9) “Service provider” means any of the following:
(A) An Alternative Community Services Waiver Program
provider certified by the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services;
(B) A childcare facility as defined by § 20-78-202;
(C) A church-exempt childcare facility as recognized under
§ 20-78-209;
(D) An early intervention program provider certified by
the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services;
(E) A home- and community-based health services provider
certified by the Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance;
(F) A home healthcare service under § 20-10-801;
(G) A hospice program under § 20-7-117;
(H) A long-term care facility as defined by § 20-10-702;
(I) A nonprofit community program as defined by § 20-48-
101;
(J) An entity that provides personal care services to
individuals;
(K) A long-term care facility under § 20-10-1202; or
(L) An entity that provides services to or houses teens
and youths; and
(10) “State criminal history records check” means a review of
state criminal history records conducted by the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police; and
(11) “Third-party employee evaluation service” means an
independent, third-party service, not associated with either the licensing or
certifying agency or the service provider, authorized or otherwise eligible
under state and federal law to perform national criminal history records
checks and state criminal history records checks in order to provide the
determination of eligibility for employment under this subchapter.
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-38-103(a)(1) and (2), concerning a
service provider informing applicants and employees of service providers that
employment is contingent on a criminal history records check, are amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) Before making an offer of employment or engaging as an
independent contractor, a service provider shall inform an applicant that
employment is contingent on the satisfactory results of criminal history
records checks.
(2) If a service provider intends to make an offer of employment
to or contract with an applicant, the service provider shall conduct criminal
history records checks on the applicant under this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-38-103(b), concerning conditionally
employment for applicants and employees of service providers pending a
criminal history records check, is amended to read as follows:
(b) After a service provider satisfies the regulatory requirements of
the appropriate licensing or certifying agency governing registry checks of
applicants for employment or engagement in a contract, the service provider
may conditionally employ or contract with an applicant pending receipt of a
determination from the appropriate licensing or certifying agency or from a
third-party employee evaluation service.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-38-103(c)(2)(B)(iii), concerning
criminal history records checks for temporary employees of service providers,
is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Provide copies of the documentation to the
service provider, which shall be made available to the appropriate licensing
or certifying agency or the third-party employee evaluation service upon
request.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 20-38-103(d) and (e), concerning criminal
history records checks for applicants and employees of service providers, are
amended to read as follows:
(d) A service provider shall inform employees that continued
employment or contractual engagement is contingent on the satisfactory
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
results of criminal history records checks and shall conduct periodic
criminal history records checks on all employees no less than one (1) time
every five (5) years.
(e)(1)(A) When a service provider initiates a request for a state
criminal history records check on an applicant for employment or contract
with or an employee of the service provider, the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police shall issue within twenty-four (24) hours
an electronic report to the licensing or certifying agency.
(B) When a licensing or certifying agency submits a
request for a national criminal history records check on an applicant for
employment or contract with or an employee of the service provider, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall issue a
report to the licensing or certifying agency within ten (10) days after
receipt of the results of the national criminal history records check from
the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(2) After receipt of a report from the Identification Bureau of
the Division of Arkansas State Police, the licensing or certifying agency
shall determine whether the applicant or employee is disqualified from
employment or contract with the service provider based on the criminal
history of the applicant or employee and shall forward its determination to
the service provider.
(3)(A)(i) If the licensing or certifying agency or the third-
party employee evaluation service determines that an applicant or employee is
disqualified from employment or engagement in a contract based on the
criminal history of the applicant or employee, the service provider shall
deny employment to the applicant or shall terminate the employment of the
employee.
(ii)(a) If the applicant or employee is
disqualified from employment based on the criminal history and the service
provider wants to employ the applicant or continue to employ the employee,
the service provider shall provide written notice to the licensing or
certifying agency or the third-party employee evaluation service of the
person's identity and that the service provider has determined that the
person is not disqualified from employment because the person satisfies the
criteria for a waiver under § 20-38-105(d)(3).
(b) After receipt of written acknowledgment
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
from the licensing or certifying agency or the third-party employee
evaluation service that the service provider has determined that the
applicant or employee is not disqualified from employment because the person
satisfies the criteria for a waiver under § 20-38-105(d)(3), the service
provider may employ the applicant or continue the employment of the employee.
(B) If the licensing or certifying agency or the
third-party employee evaluation service issues a determination that an
applicant or employee is not disqualified from employment or if there is no
criminal history on an applicant or employee, the service provider may employ
the applicant or continue the employment of the employee.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 20-38-105(a), concerning disqualification
from employment with a service provider based on a criminal history records
check, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the
licensing or certifying agency shall issue a determination that a person is
disqualified as a service provider, operator, or from employment or
engagement in a contract as an independent contractor with a service provider
if the person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found
guilty of:
(A) Any of the offenses listed in subsection (b) of this
section by any court in the State of Arkansas;
(B) Any similar offense by a court in another state; or
(C) Any similar offense by a federal court.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a
service provider shall not knowingly employ or contract with a person and the
licensing or certifying agency shall not knowingly contract with, license,
exempt from licensure, certify, or otherwise authorize a person to be a
service provider if the person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or
has been found guilty of:
(A) Any of the offenses listed in subsection (b) of this
section by any court in the State of Arkansas;
(B) Any similar offense by a court in another state; or
(C) Any similar offense by a federal court.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 20-38-105(d)(1), concerning offenses that
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
do not disqualify a person from employment with a service provider based on a
criminal history records check, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) This section shall not disqualify a person from employment or
engagement in a contract with a service provider or licensure, exemption from
licensure, certification, or other operating authority as a service provider
if:
(A) The conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere
was for a misdemeanor offense;
(B) The date of the conviction or plea of guilty or nolo
contendere is at least five (5) years from the date of the request for the
criminal history records check; and
(C) The person has no criminal convictions or pleas of
guilty or nolo contendere of any type or nature during the five-year period
preceding the criminal history records check request.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 20-38-105(d)(3), concerning non-
disqualifying offenses related to employment with a service provider based on
a criminal history records check, is amended to read as follows:
(3) This section does not disqualify a person from employment or
engagement in a contract with a service provider if:
(A) The conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere
was for any of the nonviolent offenses listed below:
(i) Theft by receiving, § 5-36-106;
(ii) Forgery, § 5-37-201;
(iii) Financial identity fraud, § 5-37-227;
(iv) Resisting arrest, § 5-54-103;
(v) Criminal impersonation in the second degree, §
5-37-208(b);
(vi) Interference with visitation, § 5-26-501;
(vii) Interference with court-ordered custody, § 5-
26-502;
(viii) Prostitution, § 5-70-102; and
(ix) Sexual solicitation, § 5-70-103;
(B) The service provider wants to employ or contract with
the person;
(C) The person remains in employment or under contract
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
with the same service provider;
(D) The person has completed probation, parole, or post-
release supervision, paid all court-ordered fees or fines, including
restitution, and fully complied with all court orders pertaining to the
conviction or plea;
(E) The person will be employed by or contracted with:
(i) A long-term care facility licensed by the Office
of Long-Term Care;
(ii) An intermediate care or other facility,
developmental day treatment clinic services provider, or group home licensed
or certified by the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services; or
(iii) A childcare facility or a church-exempt
childcare facility licensed by the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood
Education;
(F) Subsequent to employment, the person does not plead
guilty or nolo contendere to or is found guilty of any offense in subsection
(b) of this section; and
(G) The person does not have a true or founded report of
child maltreatment or adult maltreatment in a central registry.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 20-38-105(e) and (f), concerning offenses
that do not disqualify a person from employment with a service provider based
on a criminal history records check, are amended to read as follows:
(e) A person shall not be disqualified from employment or engagement
in a contract with a service provider or licensure, exemption from licensure,
certification, or other operating authority as a service provider if the
person has been found guilty of or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a
misdemeanor offense not listed in subsection (b) of this section, a similar
misdemeanor offense in another state, or a similar federal misdemeanor
offense.
(f) Even if the person would otherwise be disqualified under this
section, a person shall not be disqualified from employment or engagement in
a contract with a service provider or licensure, exemption from licensure,
certification, or other operating authority as a service provider if the
person:
(1) Was not disqualified on August 31, 2009; and
04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
(2) Since August 31, 2009, has not been found guilty of or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to:
(A) An offense listed in subsection (b) of this section;
(B) A similar offense in another state; or
(C) A similar federal offense.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 20-38-106 is amended to read as follows:
20-38-106. Evidence of criminal history records checks.
(a) A service provider shall maintain on file, subject to inspection
by the Arkansas Crime Information Center, the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police, or the licensing or certifying agency
evidence that criminal history records checks have been completed on all
operators, applicants for employment, and employees of the service provider
and evidence that all operators, applicants for employment or engagement in a
contract, and employees of the service provider have been approved or
disqualified in accordance with the rules of the appropriate licensing or
certifying agency.
(b) If a service provider employs an applicant or continues the
employment of or contract with an employee who satisfied the criteria for a
waiver under § 20-38-105(d)(3), the service provider shall maintain
documentation that the person met the criteria for the waiver, including the
written acknowledgment by the licensing or certifying authority.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 20-38-110 is amended to read as follows:
20-38-110. Confidentiality.
(a) All reports obtained under this subchapter are confidential and
are restricted to the exclusive use of the Arkansas Crime Information Center,
the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, and the
licensing or certifying agency or the third-party employee evaluation
service.
(b) The information contained in reports shall not be released or
otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency except by court order and
is specifically exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act
of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., except to the licensing or certifying agency or
the third-party employee evaluation service.

04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1454
SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 20-38-112(e)(2)(C) and (D), concerning
exclusions for criminal history records checks and completion of a criminal
history records checks, are amended to read as follows:
(C) The service provider maintains evidence acceptable to
the licensing or certifying agency that the service provider types for which
employment or engagement in a contract determinations and criminal history
records checks are accepted under this subsection are operated and
administered by the same service provider; and
(D) The service provider maintains an original or copy of
the determination letter for each employee at the service provider type for
which employment or engagement in a contract determinations and criminal
history records checks are accepted under this subsection and at which the
employee who is the subject of the determination letter is employed.

/s/Bentley





















04-03-2025 16:29:38 JMB292